Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.315.025

Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) "Change in the organization and extent of school districts" means the formation and establishment of new school districts, the dissolution of existing school districts, the alteration of the boundaries of existing school districts, or all of them.

(2) "Educational service district superintendent" means the educational service district superintendent as provided for in RCW 28A.310.170 or his or her designee.

(3) "Financial oversight committee" means a committee convened pursuant to RCW 28A.315.221.

(4) "Financially insolvent district" means a school district that:

(a) Has been on binding conditions pursuant to RCW 28A.505.110 for two consecutive years and is unable to prepare a satisfactory financial plan; or

(b) Is reasonably foreseeable and likely to have a deficit general fund balance within three years and is unable to prepare a satisfactory financial plan.

(5) "Regional committee" means the regional committee on school district organization created by this chapter.

(6) "Satisfactory financial plan" means a plan approved by the superintendent of public instruction and the educational service district where a school district is located demonstrating the school district will have an adequate fund balance at the end of the plan period relying on:

(a) Currently available revenue streams provided by federal, state, or local resources; or

(b) Other revenue streams determined reasonably reliable by the educational service district where the school district is located.

(7) "School district" means the territory under the jurisdiction of a single governing board designated and referred to as the board of directors.

[ 2012 c 186 s 1; 2006 c 263 s 505; 1990 c 33 s 293; 1985 c 385 s 1; 1983 c 3 s 33; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 78; 1971 c 48 s 25; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.020. Prior: 1955 c 395 s 1; 1947 c 266 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-21. Formerly RCW 28A.315.020, 28A.57.020, 28.57.020.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Effective date—2012 c 186: "This act takes effect September 1, 2012." [ 2012 c 186 s 26.]

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1985 c 385: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1985 c 385 s 41.]

Severability—1971 c 48: See note following RCW 28A.310.250.